Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8035.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 45 of the General Laws entitled "TOWNS AND CITIES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 71
PROPERTY TAX/RENT FREEZE BILL
45-71-1. Property tax increase prohibited.
(a) Any city or town that adopts an ordinance limiting the right of a property owner,
property manager, or landlord to increase rent prices on a rental unit shall be prohibited from
increasing property tax rates or reassessing property values on affected rental units for as long as
the ordinance limiting rental increases remains in effect.
(b) The prohibition against increasing property tax rates or reassessing property values
established in this section shall remain in effect only in taxable years in which a city or town
maintains an adopted ordinance limiting the right of a property owner, property manager, or
landlord to increase rent prices on a rental unit.
(c) For the purpose of this section “rental unit” means any part of a housing accommodation
rented or offered for rent for residential occupancy, including apartments, rooms, condominiums,
single-family homes, or manufactured homes.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005468
========
LC005468 - Page 2 of 3